Maryland, session 2025, HB0147.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0147*

HOUSE BILL 147
7–136.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE” MEANS ANY
PORTABLE ELECTRONIC DEVICE FOR INDIVIDUAL USE, INCLUDING A SMARTPHONE,
TABLET, LAPTOP, OR SMARTWATCH, OR SMARTGLASSES.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COUNTY BOARD THAT HAS AN
EXISTING POLICY LIMITING THE USE OF CELLULAR PHONES AND ON THE USE OF
PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICES BY STUDENTS IN ELEMENTARY AND MIDDLE
SCHOOLS DURING SCHOOL HOURS DURING SCHOOL HOURS THAT INCLUDES A
LIMITATION ON THE USE OF A SMARTPHONE OR A DEVICE CONNECTED TO A
SMARTPHONE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME.
(C) (1) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT A POLICY
THAT PROHIBITS AN ELEMENTARY SCHOOL OR A MIDDLE SCHOOL STUDENT FROM
USING A CELLULAR PHONE OR PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE DURING SCHOOL
HOURS ON THE USE OF PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICES DURING SCHOOL HOURS.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION,
THE POLICY SHALL INCLUDE A LIMITATION ON THE USE OF A SMARTPHONE OR A
DEVICE CONNECTED TO A SMARTPHONE DURING INSTRUCTIONAL TIME.
(D) A POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT PROHIBIT A
STUDENT FROM USING A CELLULAR PHONE OR PERSONAL ELECTRONIC DEVICE
SMARTPHONE OR A DEVICE CONNECTED TO A SMARTPHONE:
(1) FOR ANY PURPOSE DOCUMENTED IN THE STUDENT’S
INDIVIDUALIZED EDUCATION PROGRAM OR SECTION 504 PLAN;
(2) TO MONITOR OR ADDRESS A STUDENT’S DOCUMENTED HEALTH
ISSUE; OR
(3) WHEN DIRECTED BY AN EDUCATOR OR ADMINISTRATOR FOR
EDUCATIONAL PURPOSES.
(E) A POLICY ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL BE
PUBLISHED:
(1) ON THE WEBSITE OF EACH COUNTY BOARD; AND
(2) IN EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL STUDENT HANDBOOK.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.

HOUSE BILL 147 3
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.